Utah statutes.
32B-3-304.   Rulemaking.

In accordance with this chapter, the commission may make rules that govern the filing under this chapter of:

(1)  a formal objection to the renewal of a retail license; and

(2)  a request for hearing filed by a retail licensee.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

